Illinois, session 104th, HB4307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-10 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)7    Sec. 1-10. Application. 8    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 9bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 10first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 11be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 12provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 13prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 14Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 15entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 16instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 17solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 18July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 19Code and its intent.20    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 21funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 22assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:23        (1) Contracts between the State and its political   HB4307- 2 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 2    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 3    this Code.4        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 5    Section 20-80.6        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 7    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.8        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 9    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 10    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 11    that individual.12        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.13        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 14    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 15    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 16    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 17    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 18    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 19    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 20    contract.21        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 22    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 23    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 24    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 25    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 26    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other   HB4307- 3 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 2    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 3    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.4        (8) (Blank).5        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 6    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.7        (10) (Blank). 8        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 9    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 10    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 11    design-build agreements entered into according to the 12    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 13    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.14        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 15    professional and artistic services entered into by the 16    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 17    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 18    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 19    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 20    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 21    as well as the final approval by the members of the 22    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.23        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 24    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 25    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 26    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be   HB4307- 4 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 2    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 3    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 4    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 5    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 6    of the terms of the contract. 7        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 8    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 9    science services in consultation with and subject to the 10    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 11    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 12    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 13    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 14    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 15    writing with justification, waive any certification 16    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 17    for services which are currently provided by members of a 18    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 19    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 20    subcontracting shall be followed.21        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 22    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 23        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 24    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 25    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.26        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that   HB4307- 5 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 2    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 3    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 4    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 5    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 6    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 7    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 8    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 9    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 10    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 11    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 12    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 13    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 14    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 15    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 16    water or waste water systems with 10,000 connections or 17    less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 21-201 of the 18    Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities owning or 19    operating utility systems consisting of public utilities 20    as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of the 21    Illinois Municipal Code. 22        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 23    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 24    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 25    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 26        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the   HB4307- 6 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 2    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 3    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 4    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 5    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 6    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 7    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 8    Medical Cannabis Program Act.9        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 10    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 11    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 12    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 13    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 14    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 15    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 16    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 17    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 18    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 19    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 20    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 21    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 22    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 23    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 24    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 25    the procurement of goods and services identified in 26    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be   HB4307- 7 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 2    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 3    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 4    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 5    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 6    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 7    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 8    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 9    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 10    description of the supply or service provided, the total 11    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 12    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 13    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 14    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 15    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 16    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 17    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 18    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 19    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 20    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).21        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 22    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 23    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 24    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 25    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 26    complete the job application process and be considered for   HB4307- 8 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 2    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 3    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 4    the essential functions of the position held by that 5    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 6    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 7    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 8    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 9    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 10    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 11    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 12        For purposes of this paragraph (19):13        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 14    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 15    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 16    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 17    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.18        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 19    directly assists an individual with a disability in 20    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 21    device.22        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 23    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 24    describing an individual with a disability. 25        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 26    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party   HB4307- 9 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 2    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 3    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 4    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 5    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section 6    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 7        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 8    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 9    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 10    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 11    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 12    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 13    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 14    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 15    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 16    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 17    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 18    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 19    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 20    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 21    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 22    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 23    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 24    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 25        (22) Contracts for project management services and 26    system integration services required for the completion of   HB4307- 10 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 2    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 3    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 4    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 5    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 6    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 7    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 8    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 9    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 10        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 11    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 12    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 13    good faith determination that it is necessary and 14    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 15    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 16    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 17    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 18    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 19    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 20    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 21    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 22        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 23    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 24    announcements, and public awareness and education 25    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 26    providers of those services that inform the public on   HB4307- 11 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 2        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 3    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 4    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 5    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 6    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 7    shall only be used for products and services procured 8    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 9    procurements may include those necessary to design and 10    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 11    services. The procurements may include, but are not 12    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 13    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 14    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 15    technical assistance and professional development, design 16    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 17    implement management and operational structures, and 18    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 19    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 20    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 21    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 22    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 23    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 24    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 25    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 26    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized   HB4307- 12 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 2    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 3    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 4    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 5    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 6    after July 1, 2027. 7        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 8    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 9    particularly minority candidates for employment, 10    including: 11            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 12        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;13            (B) production of recruitment materials; and14            (C) other services related to recruitment and 15        retention of State employees.16        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 17    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 18    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 19    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 20    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 21    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 22    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 23    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 24    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 25    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 26    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the   HB4307- 13 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 2    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 3        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 4    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 5    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 6    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 7    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 8    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 9    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 10    within this exemption. 11        (28) Procurements by the Department of Natural 12    Resources regarding the management of the Marina at the 13    North Point Marina State Recreation Area. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 15with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 16after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 17paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 18or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 19procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 20of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 21contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 22Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 23report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 24November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 25annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 26chief procurement officer.   HB4307- 14 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 2procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 3Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 4Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 5technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 6Illinois Power Agency Act. 7    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 8and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 9Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 10procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 11Illinois Lottery Law. 12    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 13Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 14assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 15to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 16facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 17Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 18of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 19of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 20costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 21construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 22full duration of construction.23    (f) (Blank). 24    (g) (Blank).25    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 26contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and   HB4307- 15 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b111-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 2    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 3necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 4expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 5Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 6privilege. 7    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 8Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 9of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 10Board Act. 11    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 12contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 13Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 14appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 15    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 16Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 17services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 18Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 19funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 20Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 21    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 22funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 23assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 24Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 25necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 26Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of   HB4307- 16 -LRB104 17150 BDA 30569 b1the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 2Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 3(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 4103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 56-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 6eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.